src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹǩǩääž:jeäʹǩˈǩ
+N: NMN_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ ;
LEXICON NMN_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ
! gradation: no
!! * Yaml: __N-jeakkeaeazh__
:ääž ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:ääž SG-NOM ;
:ää SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:iʹžže SG-ILL ;
:ää SG-LOC ;
:ä SG-COM_IN ;
:iʹžž%>e ESS/PAR ;
:ää PL-NOM ;
:ä PL-OBL ; ! CHECKME



LEXICON N_VÕNNSAŽ !!= * @CODE@ võnnsaž:võnns
+N: NMN_VÕNNSAŽ ;
LEXICON NMN_VÕNNSAŽ
! gradation: no
!! * Yaml: __N-kualazh__
:až ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:až SG-NOM ;
:a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:õʹžže SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:iʹžže SG-ILL ;
:a NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
:a SG-COM_IN ;
:õʹžže ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:iʹžže ESS/PAR ;
:a PL-NOM ;
:a PL-OBL ;


LEXICON N_JIʹLSSI !!= * @CODE@ Jiʹlssi:Jiʹlss
+N: NMN_JIʹLSSI ;
LEXICON NMN_JIʹLSSI !!= * @CODE@ Jiʹlssi:Jiʹlssi
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;
: NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !! Is this correct 2015-09-11
: PL-NOM ;
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;

LEXICON N_JÄÄKK !!= * @CODE@ Jääkk:Jääkk
+N: NMN_JÄÄKK ;
LEXICON NMN_JÄÄKK !!= * @CODE@ Jääkk:Jääkk
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^VV2V%>ja SG-ILL ;
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise SG-COM_IN ;
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u ESS/PAR ; !! Is this correct 2015-09-11
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u PL-NOM ;
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u PL-OBL ;


LEXICON N_ÅÅʹLGA !!= * @CODE@ Ååʹlga:Ååʹlg
+N: NMN_ÅÅʹLGA ;
LEXICON NMN_ÅÅʹLGA !!= * @CODE@ Ååʹlga:Ååʹlg
:a ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:a SG-NOM ;
:a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:ž NMN_SG-ILL_E ;
:a NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
:a SG-COM_IN ;
:ž%>e ESS/PAR ; !! Is this correct 2015-09-11
:a PL-NOM ;
:a PL-OBL ;

LEXICON	 N_SINIDA !!= * @CODE@ Sinida:Sinid
+N: NMN_SINIDA ;
LEXICON NMN_SINIDA !!= * @CODE@ Sinida:Sinid
:a ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:a SG-NOM ;
:a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:õʹžž NMN_SG-ILL_E ;
+Use/NG:iʹžž NMN_SG-ILL_E ;
:a NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
:a SG-COM_IN ;
:õʹžž%>e ESS/PAR ; !! Is this correct 2015-09-11
+Use/NG:iʹžž%>e ESS/PAR ; !! Is this correct 2015-09-11
:a PL-NOM ;
:a PL-OBL ;



LEXICON N_KUUʹMPEŽ !!= * @CODE@ 
+N: NMN_KUUʹMPEŽ ;
LEXICON NMN_KUUʹMPEŽ
! gradation: no
!! * kuuʹmpež:kuuʹmp
!! * Yaml: __N-kuumpezh__
!! 
:ež ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:ež SG-NOM ;
:e SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:ž NMN_SG-ILL_E ;
:e NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;
: SG-COM_IN ;
:ž NMN_ESS_E ;
:ž NMN_PAR_E ;
:i PL-OBL ;

LEXICON N_OOUMAŽ !!= * @CODE@ ooumaž:oumm
+N:  NMN_OOUMAŽ ;
LEXICON NMN_OOUMAŽ
! gradation: no
!! is for nouns with ''-ust'' +Sg+Loc; ''e'' +Sg+Ill;
!! X2 no gradation; no lowering no raising
!! N_GEN1-ILLEX1-LOCE-NOM1X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-ooumazh__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * ooumaž:ooum

!+N:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VC DenominalAdjsCShort ;

:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>až ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>až SG-NOM ;
:%>u SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>ž NMN_SG-ILL_E ;
:u NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO ;	! oummust
:u SG-COM_IN ;     		! oummuin
: SG-COM_IN ;     		! oummin
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>ž NMN_ESS_E ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>ž NMN_PAR_E ;

:u PL-OBL ;			! oummui
: PL-OBL ;			! oummi



!! Class 10 according to Feist 160-161
!!  !!ǩ-stem
LEXICON N_KAAĐNEǨ !!= * @CODE@ kaađneǩ:kaađn%^1VOWeǩ
+N: NMN_KAAĐNEǨ ;
LEXICON NMN_KAAĐNEǨ !!= * @CODE@ kaađneǩ:kaađneǩ
!!= * @CODE@ = stemtype 
!! ** Yaml: __N-kaadhnekj, N-chaustok__
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
+Use/NG:%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
+Use/NG:%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC SG-NOM ;
:%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ kaađneʹǩǩe- 
:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ kaađneeʹǩǩ
:%{XC%}%^PALNo%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ kaađnekka
:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%>e SG-LOC ;
:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ kaađniiʹǩǩin
:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ kaađneeʹǩǩ
:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC PL-OBL ;



!! Class 11 according to Feist 162
LEXICON N_VISKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viskkâd:viskk
+N: NMN_VISKKÂD ;
LEXICON NMN_VISKKÂD
:âd SG-NOM ;
:âd SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:ää SG-ILL ;
:eeʼ SG-LOC ;
:i SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:ee ESS/PAR ;

LEXICON N_MÅŠŠAD !!= * @CODE@ måššad:måšš
+N: NMN_MÅŠŠAD ;
LEXICON NMN_MÅŠŠAD
:ad SG-NOM ;
:ad SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:ää SG-ILL ;
:eeʼ SG-LOC ;
:i SG-COM_IN ;
:ee ESS/PAR ;
:ad PL-NOM ;
:i PL-OBL ;

LEXICON N_ÂʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ âʹǩǩed:âʹǩǩ
+N: NMN_ÂʹǨǨED ;
LEXICON NMN_ÂʹǨǨED
:ed SG-NOM ;
:ed SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:ää SG-ILL ;
:eeʼ SG-LOC ;
:i SG-COM_IN ;
:ee ESS/PAR ;
:ed PL-NOM ;
:i PL-OBL ;

!! Class 12 Feist 163


!! !Noun phrase heads
!! !Pl

LEXICON NMN_SG-ILL_A
:%>a SG-ILL ;
+Der/N2A: N2A_ČÄCCAI ; !!N»A: 

LEXICON NMN_SG-ILL_E
:%>e SG-ILL ;

LEXICON NMN_SG-ILL_PAL_E
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;

LEXICON NMN_SG-LOC_Â
:%>â SG-LOC ;

LEXICON NMN_SG-LOC_ZERO
: SG-LOC ;

LEXICON NMN_SG-LOC_E
:%>e SG-LOC ;


LEXICON NMN_ESS_Â
:%>â ESS ;

LEXICON NMN_ESS_E
:%>e ESS ;


LEXICON NMN_PAR_Â
:%>â PAR ;

LEXICON NMN_PAR_E
:%>e PAR ;


!! !Number and case tags
LEXICON SG-ABE
+Sg+Abe:%>taa K ;
+Sg+Abe:%>tää K ;

LEXICON SG-ABE_ʹtää
!! Has palatalization preceding
+Sg+Abe:%>ʹtää K ;

LEXICON SG-ABE_tta
!! Used with words like juurd: jurddǥatta
+Sg+Abe:%>tta K ;

LEXICON SG-ACC
+Sg+Acc: K ;

LEXICON SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL
 SG-COM_IN ;
 PL-OBL ;

LEXICON SG-COM_N
!! 
+Sg+Com:%>n K ;

LEXICON SG-COM_IN
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;

LEXICON SG-GEN
+Sg+Gen: K ;

LEXICON SG-ILL
+Sg+Ill: K ;
LEXICON SG-LOC
+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;

LEXICON SG-NOM
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON ESS/PAR
 ESS ;
 PAR ;

LEXICON ESS
+Ess:n K ;

LEXICON PAR
+Par:d K ;

LEXICON PL-OBL 
PL-OBL_LESS-ABE ;
 PL-ABE ;

LEXICON PL-OBL_LESS-ABE
 PL-ACC ;
 PL-COM ;
 PL-GEN ;
 PL-ILL ;
 PL-LOC ;


LEXICON PL-NOM
+Pl+Nom: K ;
LEXICON PL-GEN
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC
+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;
LEXICON PL-LOC
+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
LEXICON PL-COM
+Pl+Com:%>ivuiʹm K ;
LEXICON PL-ABE
+Pl+Abe:%>itaa K ;
+Pl+Abe:%>itää K ;

!! !!POSSESSIVE DECLENSION
!! !HatÂ-STEM-PX
LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN-SG ;
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN-PL ;
LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN-SG
! Adapted from Feist (2010: 175)
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>am K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>ad K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>âs K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>âm K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%>âd K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:%>âz K ;

+Sg+Abe+PxSg1:%>antää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl1:%>ântää K ;

+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:%>an K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:%>ân K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>an K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:%>ân K ;

LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-RETAIN-PL
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>an K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>ân K ;

LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO
+Sg+Loc+PxSg1:%>stan K ;
+Sg+Loc+PxSg2:%>stad K ;
+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:%>stes K ;
+Sg+Loc+PxPl1:%>steen K ;
+Sg+Loc+PxPl2:%>steed K ;
+Sg+Loc+PxPl3:%>steez K ;


LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg1:%>stan K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg2:%>stad K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:%>stes K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxPl1:%>steen K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxPl2:%>steed K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxPl3:%>steez K ;

LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-SG ;
 HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-PL ;
+Der/teʹm:»t%^1VOWẹm A_ČÂÂʹLMTEʹM ; !!= * @CODE@ essentially weakened grade derivation


LEXICON HatÂ-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-SG
+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:%>ad K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:%>âs K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:%>âd K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxPl3:%>âz K ;

+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>ad K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>âs K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:%>âd K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:%>âz K ;


+Sg+Abe+PxSg2:%>adtää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxSg3:%>âstää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl2:%>âdtää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl3:%>âztää K ;

+Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:%>an K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:%>ân K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>an K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:%>ân K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Abe+PxSg1:%>antää K ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Abe+PxPl1:%>ântää K ;

+Sg+Com+PxSg1:%>inan K ;
+Sg+Com+PxSg2:%>inad K ;
+Sg+Com+PxSg3:%>ines K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl1:%>ineen K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl2:%>ineed K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl3:%>ineez K ;
