src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
absoluttneǩ:absoluttnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
ambassneǩ:ambassnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
baŋkkšeǩ:baŋkkšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
ceerkav-väʹlddneǩ:ceerkav-väʹlddnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
dummšeǩ:dummšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
eurooppneǩ:eurooppnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
frahttooumaž:frahtt#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
franskkooumaž:franskk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
greikkneǩ:greikknẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
hamburneǩ:hamburnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
industriiduumšeǩ:industriiduumšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
irlanttneǩ:irlanttnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
israeelneǩ:israeelnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
jaappneǩ:jaappnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
jeällmâšooumaž:jeällmâš#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
jeältõkooumaž:jeältõk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
juõʹǩǩooumaž:juõʹǩǩ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
juʹridlažooumaž:juʹridlaž#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
juʹŋŋelooumaž:juʹŋŋel#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
jânnamtiõđooumaž:jânnamtiõđ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
jäämooumaž:jääm#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
katoliineǩ:katoliinẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
klassneǩ:klassnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
koontârveʹrǧǧneǩ:koontârveʹrǧǧnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
kriminaalooumaž:kriminaal#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
kussneǩ:kussnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
käänanjeäʹǩǩääž:käänanjeäʹǩˈǩ N_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ ;
kääʹmesooumaž:kääʹmes#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
käʹšnneǩ:käʹšnnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
kålggooumaž:kålgg#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
kåʹddhalltõsneǩ:kåʹddhalltõsnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
laustõkzääpneǩ:laustõkzääpnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
lettneǩ:lettnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
lookkiooumaž:lookki#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
luterneǩ:luternẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
luâttjieʹllemvueʹǩǩneǩ:luâttjieʹllemvueʹǩǩnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
luʹvddkåʹddneǩ:luʹvddkåʹddnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
lääʹǩǩooumaž:lääʹǩǩ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
maaddârooumaž:maaddâr#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
meäʹccooumaž:meäʹcc#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
minoriteʹttåskkooumaž:minoriteʹttåskk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
miârkkooumaž:miârkk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
miârrooumaž:miârr#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
muurmanneǩ:muurmannẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
mââjkõsjeäʹǩǩääž:mââjkõsjeäʹǩˈǩ N_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ ;
mäddtäälneǩ:mäddtäälnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
mättʼtõsduumšeǩ:mättʼtõsduumšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
måskkčâʹlmmooumaž:måskkčâʹlmm#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
neezzanooumaž:neezzan#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
nijddooumaž:nijdd#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
njuõlggâd:njuõ%^1VOWlgg N_VISKKÂD ;
noʹblessneǩ:noʹblessnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
nueʹđđooumaž:nueʹđđ##o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
nuʹtrneǩ:nuʹtrnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
ooudâsviikkâmduumšeǩ:ooudâsviikkâmduumšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
paasooumaž:paas#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
paaʹrtineǩ:paaʹrtinẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
parlameʹnttneǩ:parlameʹnttnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
pieʹvvreǩ:pieʹvvrẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
pleässjemkurssneǩ:pleässjemkurssnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
portugaalneǩ:portugaalnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
pâʹjjneǩ:pâʹjjnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
pâʹssooumaž:pâʹss#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
restranttjeäʹmed:rẹstrantt#jeä%^1VOWʹm N_ÂʹǨǨED ;
robotneǩ:robotnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
räʹšǩǩooumaž:räʹšǩǩ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
sauʒʒneǩ:sauʒʒnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
sijddooumaž:sijdd#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
siõrrneǩ:siõrrnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
staanooumaž:staan#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
sääʹmooumaž:sääʹm#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
sääʹmvõboršeǩ:sääʹmvõboršẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
teâttsuõjjeemåskkooumaž:teâttsuõjjeemåskk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
tiõđooumaž:tiõđ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
tuärjjõsneǩ:tuärjjõsnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
tuäʹresbeäʹlooumaž:tuäʹresbeäʹl#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
tääiʹbooumaž:tääiʹb#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
tääleeʹžžed:täälee%^1VOWʹžž N_ÂʹǨǨED ;
täʹsnntiõđooumaž:täʹsnntiõđ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
täʹǩǩõsooumaž:täʹǩǩõs#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
vaaldšemveʹrǧǧneǩ:vaaldšemveʹrǧǧnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
veeʹresooumaž:veeʹres#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
veiʹnnooumaž:veiʹnn#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
virkkâd:vi%^1VOWrkk N_VISKKÂD ;
viõʹlǧǧesmuâttooumaž:viõʹlǧǧesmuâtt#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
vuäʹddzääpneǩ:vuäʹddzääpnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
vääʹrrooumaž:vääʹrr#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
vääʹrrpuäʒʒeeʹžžed:vääʹrrpuäʒʒ#ee%^1VOWʹžž N_ÂʹǨǨED ;
väʹlljkåʹdd-duumšeǩ:väʹllj#kåʹdd-#duumšẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
zääpneǩ:zääpnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
ämmatooumaž:ämmat#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
äʹššooumaž:äʹšš#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
ålggjânnamneǩ:ålggjânnamnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
åskkooumaž:åskk#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
õhttvuõttooumaž:õhttvuõtt#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
õõʹnniäʹššooumaž:õõʹnniäʹšš#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
čeʹvetjäuʹrrneǩ:čeʹvetjäuʹrrnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
čooudooumaž:čooud##o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
čâʹlmmristtiooumaž:čâʹlmmristti#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
čõhččjeäʹǩǩääž:čõhččjeäʹǩˈǩ N_JEÄʹǨˈǨÄÄŽ ;
šõŋŋtiõđooumaž:šõŋŋtiõđ#o%^1VOWumm N_OOUMAŽ ;
ǩiõtt-tuâjjmättneǩ:ǩiõtt-tuâjjmättnẹ%^1VOWǩ N_KAAĐNEǨ ;
